src/pronoun-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON reflobl

+Acc:ietja%>jd PxCPlstem ;
+Ine:ietja%>jn PxCPlstem ;
+Ela:ietja%>jst PxCPlstem ;
+Com:ietja%>jn PxCPlstem ;


!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Ine.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Ine.
+Acc:iehtja%> PxV1 ;
+Gen:iehtja%> PxV1 ;
 +Acc+Use/NG:ietja%> PxV1 ; !
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%> PxV1 ; !
+Acc:ietja%> PxV23 ; 
+Gen:ietja%> PxV23 ;
+Acc:iehtja%> PxV23 ; 
+Gen:iehtja%> PxV23 ;
 +Acc+PxDu1:iehtja%>me K ; !variant: -me



 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/Sub+Use/NG:iehtjame K ;  ! !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxDu1+Use/NG:ietja%>me K ; ! !variant: -me
 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxDu1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller

! Formerly, all PxPl1 were marked SUB, clearly an error.
! I removed, somewhat arbitrarily, the SUB from the ones resembling Du.

 +Acc+PxPl1:iehtjame K ;  !variant: -me 
 +Gen+PxPl1:iehtjame K ;  !variant: -me 
 +Acc+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietjame K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller

! … and the same goes for the 2nd person forms
 +Acc+PxDu2:iehtja%>de K ; !variant: -me
 +Acc+PxPl2:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me 
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/Sub:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:iehtjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxDu2+Use/NG:ietja%>de K ; ! !variant: -me
 +Acc+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxDu2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Acc+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietjade K ; !variant: -me ! because of speller

 +Acc+PxSg1:ietja%>m K ;	 ! Exceptional Sg12
 +Gen+PxSg1:ietja%>m K ;  ! Exceptional Sg12
+Ill:iehtja%>s PxCi ;
 +Ill+Use/NG:alla%>s PxCi ; ! 
+Ine:ietja%>n PxCi ;
+Ela:ietja%>st PxCi ;
+Com:ietja%>jn PxCi ;
 +Ill+Use/NG:iehtja%>s PxC ; ! 
 +Ill+Use/NG:alla%>s PxC ; ! 
 +Ine+Use/NG:ietja%>n PxC ; ! 
 +Ela+Use/NG:ietja%>st PxC ; ! 
 +Com+Use/NG:ietja%>jn PxC ; ! 

+Gen:ietja%>j PxCiPlstem ;

LEXICON PxCiPlstem
 +PxDu1:ma K ;
 +PxDu1:me K ;
 +PxDu2:da K ;
 +PxDu3:ska K ;
 +PxPl1:ma K ;
 +PxPl2:da K ;
 +PxPl3:sa K ;

LEXICON  PxCPlstem
 +PxDu1:imme K ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K ;
 +PxDu3:iska K ;
 +PxPl1:imme K ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K ;
 +PxPl3:isá K ;



LEXICON refloblsg

+Gen+PxSg1:iehtja%>m NAMÁK ;
 +Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietja%>m NAMÁK ; !
+Gen+PxSg2:ietja%>t NAMÁK ;
 +Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG:iehtja%>t NAMÁK ; !
+Gen+PxSg3:iehtja%>s NAMÁK ;
+Gen+PxDu3:iehtja%>ska NAMÁK ; 
+Gen+PxPl3:iehtja%>sa NAMÁK ;
 +Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG:ietja%>s NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+PxDu3+Use/NG:ietja%>ska NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+PxPl3+Use/NG:ietja%>sa NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+PxDu1:iehtja%>me NAMÁK ; !variant: -me
 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG:iehtja%>ma NAMÁK ; !
 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG:ietja%>ma NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG:ietja%>me NAMÁK ; ! !variant: -me
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:iehtja%>ma NAMÁK ; ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:iehtja%>me NAMÁK ;  !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietja%>ma NAMÁK ; ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxPl1+Use/Sub:ietja%>me NAMÁK ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG:iehtja%>da NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:iehtja%>da NAMÁK ; ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu2:iehtja%>de NAMÁK ; !variant: -me
 +Gen+PxPl2:iehtja%>de NAMÁK ; !variant: -me 
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG:ietja%>da NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietja%>da NAMÁK ; ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG:ietja%>de NAMÁK ; ! !variant: -me
 +Gen+PxPl2+Use/Sub:ietja%>de NAMÁK ; !variant: -me ! because of speller
 +Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietja%>m NAMÁK ; !  ! Exceptional Sg12
 



LEXICON refloblpl
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma NAMÁK ;	 ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jme NAMÁK ;	 ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda NAMÁK ;	 ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jska NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma NAMÁK ;	 ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda NAMÁK ;	 ! 
 +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jsa NAMÁK ;	 ! 

 
! Reciprocal pronouns 
! -------------------

LEXICON Reciprocal 
gaska+Pron+Recipr:gaska%> PxCiPlstem ;
gaskajt+Pron+Recipr:gaska%>jd PxCPlstem ;
gaskan+Pron+Recipr:gaska%>n PxCPlstem ;


! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON Interrogative
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:mij%> K ;
 mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midja%> K ; !Alt. form ! 
 mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midjas%> K ; !Alt. form ! 
mij+Pron+Interr:ma%> oblintercas ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:mahá K ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:mat # ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:majt K ;
 mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:majdis # ; ! 
 mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:mejdes # ; ! 
 mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:majdes # ; ! 
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:massta%> K ;  
mij+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:man'na%> K ;
mij+Pron+Interr+Pl:m idiosyncmij ;
 guhtis+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:guhtis%> K ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:guhti%> K ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:gudi%> K ; 
 guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gut%> K ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr:ge%> oblintercas_guhti ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela:gæsste%> K-s ;
 guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:gæssta%> K-s ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine:gæn'na%> K-s ;
 guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:gæn'ne%> K-s ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ess:guhti%>n K-s ;
guhti+Pron+Interr+Sg+Par:gudi%>t K-s ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Attr:guhtimusj%> K ;
makkár+Pron+Interr:makkár%> dakkárcase ;
makkir+Pron+Interr:makkir%> dakkárcase ; 
galli+Pron+Interr:galli%> gallicase ;
galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:galla%> K ;
galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:gallá%>j K ;
galla+Pron+Interr:gall nubbecase ;
galles+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:galles%> K ;
 galles+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gallás%> oblsoamescase ; ! 
goabbá+Pron+Interr:goa goabbácase ;

LEXICON Relative
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:mij%> K ;
 mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midja%> K ; !Alt. form ! 
 mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:midjas%> K ; !Alt. form ! 
mij+Pron+Rel:ma%> oblintercas ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:ma%>há K ; 
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Par:ma%>t # ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:ma%>jt K ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Pl:m idiosyncmij ;
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:massta%> K ; 
mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:man'na%> K ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Rel:guhtimu ienebusjcase ;
guhtimusj+Pron+Rel+Attr:guhtimusj%> K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:guhti%> K ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Par:gudi%>t K-s ;
 guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:gudi%> K ; ! 
 guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:gut%> K ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel:ge%> oblintercas_guhti ;
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela:gæssta%> K-s ; 
 guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:gæsste%> K-s ; ! 
guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine:gæn'na%> K-s ;
makkár+Pron+Rel:makkár%> dakkárcase ;
makkir+Pron+Rel:makkir%> dakkárcase ;
goabbá+Pron+Rel:goa goabbácase ;


LEXICON oblintercas
 +Sg+Gen:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:n NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe:n#da K ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:n#dak K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:n#dagi K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:n#dagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:n#tagá K ; ! 
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:v K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:vva K-s ; ! 
 +Sg+Ill:si K-s ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:sa K-s ;  ! 
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:sás K-s ; ! 
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:sá K-s ;   ! 
 +Sg+Com:jna K-s ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/NG:jnas K-s ; ! 
 +Sg+Par:t K-s ;
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:n K ;
 +Sg+Ine+Attr:n K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:j NAMÁK ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe:jda K ;
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:jdak K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:jdagi K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:jdagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:jtagá K ; ! 
 +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:jda K-s ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/NG:jn K-s ; !N&J
 +Pl+Ine+Use/NG:jna K-s ;!Spiik ! 
 +Pl+Ela+Use/NG:js K ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/NG:jsta K ; !Spiik ! 
 +Pl+Com:j K ;
 +Ess:nen K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:n'na K-s ; ! 
 +Ess+Use/NG:n'nas K-s ; !
 

LEXICON Indefinite
fera% mij+Pron+Indef:fera% ma%> oblintercas ;
 vajku% mij+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vajku% ma%> oblintercas ; ! speller diehti
 vájk% mij+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vájk% ma%> oblintercas ; ! speller diehti
